02_Morphology/lat.twol
Alphabet

A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z
a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z
Ā ā Ē ē Ī ī Ō ō Ū ū
%>;

Rules

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"Fifth-declension i-stem datives and genitives"
e:ē <=> i: %>: _ ī: #;
